Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-521
Rural or suburban fire protection district; dissolution; petition; election; disbursement of funds.

A petition seeking the dissolution of a rural or suburban fire protection district, signed by the registered voters of the district equal in number to ten percent of the number of registered voters, may be filed with the board of directors. If the board finds that all indebtedness of the district can be satisfied from funds on hand or to be received from the then current levy, it shall submit the question of dissolution to the registered voters of the district at the next annual rural or suburban fire protection district election. If a majority of those voting on the question vote in favor of such dissolution, the board of directors shall declare the district dissolved and certify such action to the county boards of the counties in which the district is located. After satisfying the outstanding indebtedness of the district, the secretary-treasurer of the district shall transfer to the county treasurers of the counties in which the district is situated any remaining funds of the district in the same proportion as the area of the district in each county bears to the total area of the district, and such funds shall be deposited in the general fund of the respective counties.

Laws 1967, c. 206, § 1, p. 563;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 18.